apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="fr/iessen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>iesse</l>     <r>iessen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>iesse</l>     <r>iessen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëss</l>       <r>iessen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ësst</l>      <r>iessen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesse</l>     <r>iessen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesst</l>     <r>iessen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesse</l>     <r>iessen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iess</l>      <r>iessen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesst</l>     <r>iessen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fr/oen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>oe</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>oe</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ees</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oe</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oe</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/ueren__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>uere</l>      <r>ueren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>uere</l>      <r>ueren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iers</l>      <r>ueren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iert</l>      <r>ueren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uere</l>      <r>ueren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uert</l>      <r>ueren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uere</l>      <r>ueren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uer</l>       <r>ueren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uert</l>      <r>ueren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/änken__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änks</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änkt</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änkt</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éing</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éings</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éing</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinge</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éingt</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinge</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>oung</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oungs</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oung</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ounge</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oungt</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ounge</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>änk</l>       <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änkt</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="geb/ären__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>äre</l>       <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uer</l>       <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>äre</l>       <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iers</l>      <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iert</l>      <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äre</l>       <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iert</l>      <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äre</l>       <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>är</l>        <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äert</l>      <r>ären<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ged/enken__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>enke</l>      <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uecht</l>     <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enke</l>      <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enks</l>      <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enkt</l>      <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enke</l>      <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enkt</l>      <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enke</l>      <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enk</l>       <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enkt</l>      <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="friessen">        <i>fr</i><par n="fr/iessen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="froen">           <i>fr</i><par n="fr/oen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fueren">          <i>f</i><par n="f/ueren__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fänken">          <i>f</i><par n="f/änken__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gebären">         <i>geb</i><par n="geb/ären__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gedenken">        <i>ged</i><par n="ged/enken__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hänken">          <i>h</i><par n="f/änken__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iessen">          <i></i><par n="fr/iessen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="joen">            <i>j</i><par n="fr/oen__vblex"/></e>
